it: Applicazione pager: Settore automobilistico; Assistente; Chiamata cliente; Antincendio; Uso generale; Ospite; Chiamata infermiere; Soccorso; Negozi; Cameriere; Personale; Veicolo; Stile orologio; Altro
ro-RO: Aplicație pager: Automobile; Îngrijitor; Apel clienți; Incendiu; Uz general; Oaspeți; Apel asistentă; Salvare; Retail; Server; Personal; Vehicul; Tip ceas; Altele
ko: 호출기 용도: 자동차; 간병인; 고객 호출; 화재; 범용; 게스트; 간호사 호출; 구조; 소매; 서버; 직원; 자동차; 시계형; 기타
nl: Pager toepassing: Automobiel; Verzorger; Klantenoproep; Brand; Algemeen gebruik; Gast; Verpleegoproep; Redding; Retail; Server; Personeel; Voertuig; Horlogestijl; Andere
de: Pager-Anwendung: Automobil; Pflegekraft; Kundenruf; Feuerwehr; Allzweck; Gast; Schwesternruf; Rettung; Einzelhandel; Kellner; Personal; Fahrzeug; Uhrenstil; Sonstiges
nb: Personsøker anvendelse: Kjøretøy; Omsorgsperson; Kundekall; Brann; Generell bruk; Gjest; Sykepleiekall; Redning; Detaljhandel; Servitør; Personale; Kjøretøy; Klokkestil; Annet
tr: Çağrı cihazı uygulaması: Otomotiv; Bakım personeli; Müşteri çağrısı; Yangın; Genel amaçlı; Misafir; Hemşire çağrısı; Kurtarma; Perakende; Sunucu; Personel; Araçlar; Saat tipi; Diğer
es: Aplicación del buscapersonas: Automóviles; Cuidador; Llamada de cliente; Fuego; Propósito general; Huésped; Llamada de enfermera; Rescate; Venta al por menor; Servidor; Personal; Vehículo; Estilo reloj; Otros
cs: Aplikace pageru: Automobily; Pečovatelský; Volání zákazníka; Požární; Univerzální; Pro hosty; Volání sestry; Záchranný; Prodejny; Serverový; Pro personál; Vozidlo; Ve stylu hodinek; Jiné
hu: Személyhívó alkalmazás: Autóipar; Gondozói; Ügyfélhívó; Tűzvédelmi; Általános célú; Vendéghívó; Nővérhívó; Mentési; Kiskereskedelem; Pincérhívó; Személyzeti; Jármű; Karóra stílusú; Egyéb
ru: Применение пейджера: Автомобили; Для сиделки; Вызов клиента; Пожарный; Общего назначения; Для гостей; Вызов медсестры; Спасательный; Розничная торговля; Для официанта; Для персонала; Машины; В виде часов; Другой
fi: Hakulaitteen sovellus: Autoilu; Hoitaja; Asiakaskutsu; Palo; Yleiskäyttö; Vieras; Hoitajakutsu; Pelastus; Jälleenmyynti; Palvelin; Henkilökunta; Ajoneuvo; Kellomalli; Muu
hr-HR: Primjena pagera: Automobilizam; Njegovatelj; Poziv kupaca; Požar; Opća namjena; Gost; Poziv medicinske sestre; Spašavanje; Maloprodaja; Poslužitelj; Osoblje; Vozilo; U stilu sata; Ostalo
bg-BG: Приложение на пейджъра: Автомобили; За полагащ грижи; Повикване на клиенти; Пожарен; Общо предназначение; За гости; Повикване на медицинска сестра; Спасителен; Търговия на дребно; За сервитьор; За персонал; Превозно средство; Тип часовник; Други
sl-SI: Uporaba pozivnika: Avtomobilizem; Negovalec; Klic stranke; Požarna; Splošna uporaba; Gost; Klic medicinske sestre; Reševalna; Trgovina; Strežnik; Osebje; Vozilo; V obliki ure; Drugo
pl: Zastosowanie pagera: Motoryzacyjny; Opiekun; Wezwanie klienta; Pożarniczy; Ogólnego przeznaczenia; Gość; Wezwanie pielęgniarki; Ratowniczy; Sprzedaż detaliczna; Kelnerski; Personel; Pojazd; W stylu zegarka; Inne
pt-PT: Aplicação do pager: Automóveis; Cuidador; Chamada de cliente; Incêndio; Uso geral; Hóspede; Chamada de enfermagem; Resgate; Retalho; Servidor; Pessoal; Veículo; Estilo relógio; Outro
zh-CN: 寻呼机应用: 汽车主题; 看护人; 客户呼叫; 消防; 通用; 客人; 护士呼叫; 救援; 零售业; 服务器; 员工; 车辆; 手表式; 其他
el: Εφαρμογή βομβητή: Αυτοκίνητα; Φροντιστή; Κλήση πελάτη; Πυρκαγιάς; Γενικής χρήσης; Επισκέπτη; Κλήση νοσοκόμας; Διάσωσης; Λιανικό εμπόριο; Σερβιτόρου; Προσωπικού; Οχημα; Τύπου ρολογιού; Άλλο
lt-LT: Pranešimų gaviklio paskirtis: Automobiliai; Slaugytojo; Kliento iškvietimas; Gaisrinis; Bendrosios paskirties; Svečių; Slaugytojo iškvietimas; Gelbėjimo; Mažmeninė prekyba; Padavėjo; Personalo; Transporto priemonė; Laikrodžio stiliaus; Kita
vi: Ứng dụng máy nhắn tin: Máy móc tự động; Người chăm sóc; Gọi khách hàng; Cứu hỏa; Đa dụng; Khách; Gọi y tá; Cứu hộ; Bán lẻ; Phục vụ; Nhân viên; Xe cộ; Kiểu đồng hồ; Khác
ja: ページャー用途: 自動車; 介護者; 顧客呼び出し; 火災; 汎用; ゲスト; ナースコール; 救助; 小売; サーバー; スタッフ; 車; 腕時計型; その他
da: Personsøger-anvendelse: Biler; Plejepersonale; Kundeopkald; Brand; Generel anvendelse; Gæst; Sygeplejekald; Redning; Detail; Server; Personale; Køretøj; Ur-stil; Andet
sv: Personsökarapplikation: Bil; Vårdgivare; Kundanrop; Brand; Allmänt ändamål; Gäst; Sjuksköterskeanrop; Räddning; Detaljhandel; Server; Personal; Fordon; Klockstil; Övrigt
pt-BR: Aplicação do pager: Automotivo; Cuidador; Chamada de cliente; Incêndio; Uso geral; Convidado; Chamada de enfermagem; Resgate; Varejo; Servidor; Equipe; Veículo; Estilo relógio; Outro
zh-TW: 呼叫器應用: 汽車; 照護者; 客戶呼叫; 消防; 通用; 賓客; 護士呼叫; 救援; 零售; 服務員; 員工; 車輛; 手錶式; 其他
fr: Application du téléavertisseur: Automobile; Soignant; Appel client; Incendie; Usage général; Invité; Appel infirmier; Secours; Commerce de détail; Serveur; Personnel; Véhicule; Style montre; Autre
sk-SK: Použitie pagera: Automobily; Opatrovateľský; Zákaznícke volanie; Požiarny; Všeobecné použitie; Hosťovský; Sesterské volanie; Záchranný; Maloobchod; Serverový; Personálny; Vozidlový; Hodinky; Iné
th: การใช้งานเพจเจอร์: ยานยนต์; ผู้ดูแล; เรียกลูกค้า; ดับเพลิง; ใช้งานทั่วไป; แขก; เรียกพยาบาล; กู้ภัย; การค้าปลีก; เซิร์ฟเวอร์; พนักงาน; ยานพาหนะ; รูปแบบนาฬิกา; อื่นๆ
en: Pager application: Automotive; Caregiver; Customer call; Fire; General purpose; Guest; Nurse call; Rescue; Retail; Server; Staff; Vehicle; Watch-style; Other